Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 32 Advance Directives for Health Care
31-32-7.
Duties and responsibilities of health care agents.

A health care agent shall not have the authority to make a particular health care decision different from or contrary to the declarant’s decision, if any, if the declarant is able to understand the general nature of the health care procedure being consented to or refused, as determined by the declarant’s attending physician based on such physician’s good faith judgment.

A health care agent shall be under no duty to exercise granted powers or to assume control of or responsibility for the declarant’s health care; provided, however, that when granted powers are exercised, the health care agent shall use due care to act for the benefit of the declarant in accordance with the terms of the advance directive for health care. A health care agent shall exercise granted powers in such manner as the health care agent deems consistent with the intentions and desires of the declarant. If a declarant’s intentions and desires are unclear, the health care agent shall act in the declarant’s best interest considering the benefits, burdens, and risks of the declarant’s circumstances and treatment options.

A health care agent may act in person or through others reasonably employed by the health care agent for that purpose but may not delegate authority to make health care decisions.

A health care agent may sign and deliver all instruments, negotiate and enter into all agreements, and do all other acts reasonably necessary to implement the exercise of the powers granted to the health care agent. A health care agent shall be authorized to accompany a declarant in an ambulance or air ambulance if in the opinion of the ambulance personnel protocol permits a passenger and to visit or consult in person with a declarant who is admitted to a health care facility if the health care facility’s protocol permits such visitation.

The form of advance directive for health care contained in Code Section 31-32-4 shall, and any different form of advance directive for health care may, include the following powers, subject to any limitations appearing on the face of the form:

The health care agent is authorized to consent to and authorize or refuse, or to withhold or withdraw consent to, any and all types of medical care, treatment, or procedures relating to the physical or mental health of the declarant, including any medication program, surgical procedures, life-sustaining procedures, or provision of nourishment or hydration for the declarant, but not including sterilization or involuntary hospitalization or involuntary treatment covered by Title 37;

The health care agent is authorized to admit the declarant to or discharge the declarant from any health care facility;

The health care agent is authorized to contract for any health care facility or service in the name of and on behalf of the declarant and to bind the declarant to pay for all such services, and the health care agent shall not be personally liable for any services or care contracted for or on behalf of the declarant;

At the declarant’s expense and subject to reasonable rules of the health care provider to prevent disruption of the declarant’s health care, the health care agent shall have the same right the declarant has to examine and copy and consent to disclosure of all the declarant’s medical records that the health care agent deems relevant to the exercise of the agent’s powers, whether the records relate to mental health or any other medical condition and whether they are in the possession of or maintained by any physician, psychiatrist, psychologist, therapist, health care facility, or other health care provider, notwithstanding the provisions of any statute or other rule of law to the contrary; and

Unless otherwise provided, the health care agent is authorized to direct that an autopsy of the declarant’s body be made; to make an anatomical gift of any part or all of the declarant’s body pursuant to Article 6 of Chapter 5 of Title 44, the “Georgia Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act”; and to direct the final disposition of the declarant’s body, including funeral arrangements, burial, or cremation.

A court may remove a health care agent if it finds that the health care agent is not acting properly.

With respect to mental health care, the duties and responsibilities of a health care agent under this chapter shall be subordinate to the duties and responsibilities of a mental health care agent under Chapter 11 of Title 37 and subject to the terms of a psychiatric advance directive executed by the declarant before, simultaneously with, or after the advance directive for health care under which the health care agent is acting.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-32-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 2/HB 24; Ga. L. 2008, p. 503, § 4/SB 405; Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 2-13/HB 752.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in paragraph (e)(1), substituted “sterilization or” for “psychosurgery, sterilization, or” and inserted “involuntary” near the end; and added subsection (g).

31-32-8.
Duties and responsibilities of health care providers.

Each health care provider and each other person with whom a health care agent interacts under an advance directive for health care shall be subject to the following duties and responsibilities:

It is the responsibility of the health care agent or declarant to notify the health care provider of the existence of the advance directive for health care and any amendment or revocation thereof. A health care provider furnished with a copy of an advance directive for health care shall make such copy a part of the declarant’s medical records and shall enter in the records any change in or termination of the advance directive for health care by the declarant that becomes known to the health care provider. A health care provider shall grant a health care agent adequate access to a declarant when a declarant is admitted to any health care facility. Whenever a health care provider believes a declarant is unable to understand the general nature of the health care procedure which the provider deems necessary, the health care provider shall consult with any available health care agent known to the health care provider who then has power to act for the declarant under an advance directive for health care;

A health care decision made by a health care agent in accordance with the terms of an advance directive for health care shall be complied with by every health care provider to whom the decision is communicated, subject to the health care provider’s right to administer treatment for the declarant’s comfort or alleviation of pain; provided, however, that if the health care provider is unwilling to comply with the health care agent’s decision, the health care provider shall promptly inform the health care agent who shall then be responsible for arranging for the declarant’s transfer to another health care provider. A health care provider who is unwilling to comply with the health care agent’s decision shall provide reasonably necessary consultation and care in connection with the pending transfer;

At the declarant’s expense and subject to reasonable rules of the health care provider to prevent disruption of the declarant’s health care, each health care provider shall give a health care agent authorized to receive such information under an advance directive for health care the same right the declarant has to examine and copy any part or all of the declarant’s medical records that the health care agent deems relevant to the exercise of the health care agent’s powers, whether the records relate to mental health or any other medical condition and whether they are in the possession of or maintained by any physician, psychiatrist, psychologist, therapist, health care facility, or other health care provider, notwithstanding the provisions of any statute or rule of law to the contrary; and

If and to the extent an advance directive for health care empowers the health care agent to direct that an autopsy of the declarant’s body be made; to make an anatomical gift of any part or all of the declarant’s body pursuant to Article 6 of Chapter 5 of Title 44, the “Georgia Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act”; or to direct the final disposition of the declarant’s body, including funeral arrangements, burial, or cremation, the decisions of the health care agent on such matters shall be deemed the act of the declarant or of the person who has priority under law to make the necessary decisions, and each person to whom a direction by the health care agent in accordance with the terms of the agency is communicated shall comply with such direction to the extent it is in accord with reasonable medical standards or other relevant standards at the time of reference.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-32-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 2/HB 24; Ga. L. 2008, p. 503, § 4/SB 405.

Law reviews.

For note, “An Advance Directive: The Elective, Effective Way to be Protective of Your Rights,” see 68 Mercer L. Rev. 521 (2017).

31-32-9.
Conditions precedent to carrying out health care treatment preferences; physician’s failure to comply with treatment preferences.

Prior to effecting a withholding or withdrawal of life-sustaining procedures or the withholding or withdrawal of the provision of nourishment or hydration from a declarant pursuant to a declarant’s directions in an advance directive for health care, the attending physician:

Shall determine that, to the best of that attending physician’s knowledge, the declarant is not pregnant, or if she is, that the fetus is not viable and that the declarant has specifically indicated in the advance directive for health care that the declarant’s directions regarding the withholding or withdrawal of life-sustaining procedures or the withholding or withdrawal of the provision of nourishment or hydration are to be carried out;

Shall, without delay after the diagnosis of a terminal condition or state of permanent unconsciousness of the declarant, take the necessary steps to provide for the written certification of the declarant’s terminal condition or state of permanent unconsciousness in accordance with the procedure set forth in subsection (b) of this Code section;

Shall make a reasonable effort to determine that the advance directive for health care complies with Code Section 31-32-5; and

Shall make the advance directive for health care and the written certification of the terminal condition or state of permanent unconsciousness a part of the declarant patient’s medical records.

The procedure for establishing a terminal condition or state of permanent unconsciousness is as follows: two physicians, one of whom shall be the attending physician, who, after personally examining the declarant, shall certify in writing, based upon conditions found during the course of their examination and in accordance with currently accepted medical standards, that the declarant is in a terminal condition or state of permanent unconsciousness.

The advance directive for health care shall be presumed, unless revoked, to be the directions of the declarant regarding the withholding or withdrawal of life-sustaining procedures or the withholding or withdrawal of the provision of nourishment or hydration.

The attending physician who fails or refuses to comply with the declarant’s directions regarding the withholding or withdrawal of life-sustaining procedures or the withholding or withdrawal of the provision of nourishment or hydration shall advise promptly the health care agent, if one is appointed, and, otherwise, next of kin or legal guardian of the declarant that such physician is unwilling to effectuate such directions. The attending physician shall thereafter at the election of the health care agent, if one is appointed, and, otherwise, next of kin or legal guardian of the declarant:

Make a good faith attempt to effect the transfer of the declarant to another physician who will comply with the declarant’s directions regarding the withholding or withdrawal of life-sustaining procedures or the withholding or withdrawal of the provision of nourishment or hydration; or

Permit the health care agent, if one is appointed, and, otherwise, next of kin or legal guardian of the declarant to obtain another physician who will comply with the declarant’s directions regarding the withholding or withdrawal of life-sustaining procedures or the withholding or withdrawal of the provision of nourishment or hydration.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-32-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 2/HB 24.

31-32-10.
Immunity from liability or disciplinary action.

Each health care provider, health care facility, and any other person who acts in good faith reliance on any direction or decision by the health care agent shall be protected and released to the same extent as though such person had interacted directly with the declarant as a fully competent person. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the following specific provisions shall also govern, protect, and validate the acts of the health care agent and each such health care provider, health care facility, and any other person acting in good faith reliance on such direction or decision:

No such health care provider, health care facility, or person shall be subject to civil or criminal liability or discipline for unprofessional conduct solely for complying with any direction or decision by the health care agent, even if death or injury to the declarant ensues;

No such health care provider, health care facility, or person shall be subject to civil or criminal liability or discipline for unprofessional conduct solely for failure to comply with any direction or decision by the health care agent, as long as such health care provider, health care facility, or person promptly informs the health care agent of such health care provider’s, health care facility’s, or person’s refusal or failure to comply with such direction or decision by the health care agent. The health care agent shall then be responsible for arranging the declarant’s transfer to another health care provider. A health care provider who is unwilling to comply with the health care agent’s decision shall continue to provide reasonably necessary consultation and care in connection with the pending transfer;

If the actions of a health care provider, health care facility, or person who fails to comply with any direction or decision by the health care agent are substantially in accord with reasonable medical standards at the time of reference and the provider cooperates in the transfer of the declarant pursuant to paragraph (2) of Code Section 31-32-8, the health care provider, health care facility, or person shall not be subject to civil or criminal liability or discipline for unprofessional conduct for failure to comply with the advance directive for health care;

No health care agent who, in good faith, acts with due care for the benefit of the declarant and in accordance with the terms of an advance directive for health care, or who fails to act, shall be subject to civil or criminal liability for such action or inaction;

If the authority granted by an advance directive for health care is revoked under Code Section 31-32-6, a person shall not be subject to criminal prosecution or civil liability for acting in good faith reliance upon such advance directive for health care unless such person had actual knowledge of the revocation; and

In the event a declarant has appointed a mental health care agent, no health care provider, health care facility, or person who relies in good faith on the direction of such mental health care agent shall be subject to civil or criminal liability or discipline for unprofessional conduct for complying with any direction or decision of such mental health care agent in the event the declarant’s condition is subsequently determined to be a non-mental health care related condition.

No person shall be civilly liable for failing or refusing in good faith to effectuate the declarant’s directions regarding the withholding or withdrawal of life-sustaining procedures or the withholding or withdrawal of the provision of nourishment or hydration.

No physician or any person acting under a physician’s direction and no health care facility or any agent or employee thereof who, acting in good faith in accordance with the requirements of this chapter, causes the withholding or withdrawal of life-sustaining procedures or the withholding or withdrawal of the provision of nourishment or hydration from a declarant or who otherwise participates in good faith therein shall be subject to any civil or criminal liability or guilty of unprofessional conduct therefor.

No person who witnesses an advance directive for health care in good faith and in accordance with subsection (c) of Code Section 31-32-5 shall be civilly or criminally liable or guilty of unprofessional conduct for such action.

Any person who participates in the withholding or withdrawal of life-sustaining procedures or the withholding or withdrawal of the provision of nourishment or hydration pursuant to an advance directive for health care and who has actual knowledge that such advance directive for health care has been properly revoked shall not have any civil or criminal immunity otherwise granted under this chapter for such conduct.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-32-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 2/HB 24; Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 2-14/HB 752.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted “and” from the end of paragraph (a)(4), substituted “; and” for a period at the end of paragraph (a)(5), and added paragraph (a)(6).

Law reviews.

For note, “An Advance Directive: The Elective, Effective Way to be Protective of Your Rights,” see 68 Mercer L. Rev. 521 (2017).

31-32-11.
Advance directive for health care’s relationship to criminal and insurance laws.

The making of an advance directive for health care containing a declarant’s directions regarding the withholding or withdrawal of life-sustaining procedures or the withholding or withdrawal of the provision of nourishment or hydration, shall not, for any purpose, constitute a suicide. If the declarant’s death results from the withholding or withdrawal of life-sustaining procedures or the withholding or withdrawal of the provision of nourishment or hydration in accordance with the terms of an advance directive for health care, the death shall not constitute a suicide or homicide for any purpose under any statute or other rule of law.

The making of an advance directive for health care shall not restrict, inhibit, or impair in any manner the sale, procurement, issuance, or enforceability of any policy of life insurance, annuity, or other contract that is conditioned on the life or death of the declarant nor shall it be deemed to modify the terms of an existing policy of life insurance, annuity, or other contract that is conditioned on the life or death of the declarant, notwithstanding any term of the policy to the contrary. No policy of life insurance, annuity, or other contract that is conditioned on the life or death of the declarant shall be legally impaired or invalidated in any manner by the making of an advance directive for health care pursuant to this chapter or by the withholding or withdrawal of life-sustaining procedures or the withholding or withdrawal of the provision of nourishment or hydration from an insured declarant, nor shall the making of such an advance directive for health care or the withholding or withdrawal of life-sustaining procedures or the withholding or withdrawal of the provision of nourishment or hydration operate to deny any additional insurance benefits for accidental death of the declarant in any case in which the terminal condition of the declarant is the result of accident, notwithstanding any term of the policy to the contrary.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-32-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 2/HB 24.

31-32-12.
Restriction on requiring and preparing advance directives for health care.

No physician, health care facility, or health care provider and no health care service plan, insurer issuing disability insurance, or self-insured employee welfare benefit plan shall require any person to execute an advance directive for health care as a condition for being insured for or receiving health care services.

A health care facility shall only be authorized to prepare or offer to prepare an advance directive for health care if specifically requested to do so by a person desiring to execute an advance directive for health care or, if such health care facility’s offer is not coercive in nature and such person consents to such offer. For purposes of this subsection, the Department of Corrections shall not be deemed to be a health care facility.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-32-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 2/HB 24; Ga. L. 2017, p. 164, § 57/HB 127; Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 2-15/HB 752.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, substituted “or self-insured employee welfare benefit plan” for “self-insured employee welfare benefit plan, or nonprofit hospital service plan” near the middle of subsection (a).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in the first sentence in subsection (b), substituted “A health care facility shall only be authorized to” for “No health care facility shall” at the beginning, substituted “if specifically” for “unless specifically”, and added “or, if such health care facility’s offer is not coercive in nature and such person consents to such offer” at the end.

31-32-13.
Penalties and legal sanctions for violations.

All persons shall be subject to the following sanctions in relation to advance directives for health care, in addition to all other sanctions applicable under any other law or rule of professional conduct:

Any person who, without the declarant’s consent, willfully conceals, cancels, or alters an advance directive for health care or any amendment or revocation of the advance directive for health care or who falsifies or forges an advance directive for health care, amendment, or revocation shall be civilly liable and guilty of a misdemeanor;

Any person who falsifies or forges an advance directive for health care of another or who willfully conceals or withholds personal knowledge of an amendment or revocation of an advance directive for health care with the intent to cause a withholding or withdrawal of life-sustaining procedures or the withholding or withdrawal of the provision of nourishment or hydration contrary to the intent of the declarant and thereby, because of such act, directly causes life-sustaining procedures or the provision of nourishment or hydration to be withheld or withdrawn and death thereby to be hastened shall be subject to prosecution for criminal homicide as provided in Chapter 5 of Title 16;

Any person who requires or prevents execution of an advance directive for health care as a condition of ensuring or providing any type of health care services to an individual shall be civilly liable and guilty of a misdemeanor; and

Any person who willfully witnesses an advance directive for health care knowing at the time he or she is not eligible to witness such advance directive under subsection (c) of Code Section 31-32-5 or who coerces or attempts to coerce a person into making an advance directive for health care shall be civilly liable and guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-32-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 2/HB 24.

31-32-14.
Effect of chapter on other legal rights and duties.

Nothing in this chapter shall impair or supersede any legal right or legal responsibility which any person may have to effect the withholding or withdrawal of life-sustaining procedures or the withholding or withdrawal of the provision of nourishment or hydration in any lawful manner.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to condone, authorize, or approve mercy killing or to permit any affirmative or deliberate act or omission to end life other than to permit the process of dying as provided in this chapter. Furthermore, nothing in this chapter shall be construed to condone, authorize, or approve abortion.

This chapter shall create no presumption concerning the intention of an individual who has not executed an advance directive for health care to consent to the use or withholding or withdrawal of life-sustaining procedures or the withholding or withdrawal of the provision of nourishment or hydration in the event of a terminal condition or state of permanent unconsciousness.

Except to the extent provided in an advance directive for health care and subject to the health care agent’s duty to exercise granted powers in such manner as the health care agent deems consistent with the intentions and desires of the declarant pursuant to subsection (b) of Code Section 31-32-7, a declarant’s directions in an advance directive for health care regarding the withholding or withdrawal of life-sustaining procedures or the withholding or withdrawal of the provision of nourishment or hydration shall be ineffective as long as there is a health care agent available and willing to make decisions for and on behalf of the declarant regarding the withholding or withdrawal of life-sustaining procedures or the withholding or withdrawal of the provision of nourishment or hydration when the declarant is in a terminal condition or state of permanent unconsciousness.

Unless an advance directive for health care provides otherwise, a health care agent who is known to a health care provider to be available and willing to make health care decisions for a declarant has priority over any other person, including any guardian, to act for the declarant in all matters covered by the advance directive for health care.

Nothing in this chapter shall affect the delegation of a parent’s power to control the health care of a minor child.

With respect to mental health care, nothing in this chapter shall supersede the duties and responsibilities of a mental health care agent under Chapter 11 of Title 37 or the terms of a psychiatric advance directive executed by the declarant before, simultaneously with, or after the advance directive for health care under which the health care agent is acting.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-32-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 2/HB 24; Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 2-16/HB 752.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added subsection (g).